Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.050

Family courts—Appointment of assistants.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in each county the superior court may appoint the following persons to assist the family court in disposing of its business:

(a) One or more attorneys to act as family court commissioners, and

(b) Such investigators, stenographers and clerks as the court shall find necessary to carry on the work of the family court.

(2) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of family court commissioner positions.

(3) The appointments provided for in this section shall be made by majority vote of the judges of the superior court of the county and may be made in addition to all other appointments of commissioners and other judicial attaches otherwise authorized by law. Family court commissioners and investigators shall serve at the pleasure of the judges appointing them and shall receive such compensation as the county legislative authority shall determine. The appointments may be full or part-time positions. A person appointed as a family court commissioner may also be appointed to any other commissioner position authorized by law.

[ 1993 c 15 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 17; 1989 c 199 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 83 s 1; 1949 c 50 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-34.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 15: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 12, 1993]." [ 1993 c 15 s 3.]

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Court

clerks, reporters, and bailiffs: Chapter 2.32 RCW.

commissioners and referees: Chapter 2.24 RCW.